Hawaii statutes.
§386-81 Notice of injury; waiver. No
proceedings for compensation under this chapter shall be maintained unless
written notice of the injury has been given to the employer as soon as
practicable after the happening thereof. The notice may be given by the
injured employee or by some other person on the employee's behalf. Failure to
give such notice shall not bar a claim under this chapter if[:]

(1) The
employer or the employer's agent in charge of the work in the place where the
injury was sustained had knowledge of the injury;

(2) Medical,
surgical, or hospital service and supplies have been furnished to the injured
employee by the employer; or

(3) For
some satisfactory reason the notice could not be given and the employer has not
been prejudiced by such failure.

Unless
the employer is prejudiced thereby notice of injury shall be deemed to have
been waived by the employer if objection to the failure to give such notice is
not raised at the first hearing on a claim in respect of such injury of which the
employer is given reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard. [L 1963, c
116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-90; HRS §386-81; gen ch 1985]

Revision
Note

In the first paragraph, (1) to (3) reformatted
as paragraphs (1) to (3) and in paragraph (1), "or" deleted pursuant
to §23G-15.

Case Notes

Notice. 24 H. 97 (1917).

Neither technical nor formal notice is required. 24 H. 731
(1919).

Furnishing medical aid. 32 H. 503 (1932).

Sufficiency of knowledge of injury. 32 H. 503 (1932).

Time limitation runs from date of accident, not time of
discovery of permanency of injury. 32 H. 920 (1933).

Minors. 32 H. 928 (1933).

Time limitation runs from date employee is disabled by injury
from working; notice dispensed with. 34 H. 65 (1937).

Time for giving of notice; there is compliance where claimant
gives notice after claimant becomes aware or should have become aware that the
injury may be compensable. 50 H. 519, 445 P.2d 34 (1968).

"Satisfactory reason" to excuse late notice. 55 H.
558, 523 P.2d 832 (1974).

Cited: 24 H. 97, 101 (1917).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next